Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 3
FORMATION AND INITIAL ARTICLES OF LIMITED
COOPERATIVE ASSOCIATION - BYLAWS

7-58-301. Organizers.

A limited cooperative association must be organized by one or more organizers.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 769, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-302. Formation of limited cooperative association.

To form a limited cooperative association, one or more organizers of the association shall deliver or cause to be delivered articles to the secretary of state for filing.

A limited cooperative association is formed after articles that substantially comply with section 7-58-303 (1) become effective under section 7-90-304.

If articles filed by the secretary of state state a delayed effective date, a limited cooperative association is not formed if, before the articles take effect, a statement of correction is filed pursuant to section 7-90-304 (3) that revokes the articles.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 769, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-303. Articles.

The articles shall state:

The domestic entity name of the limited cooperative association;

The purposes for which the limited cooperative association is formed, which may be for any lawful purpose;

The registered agent name and registered agent address of the association's initial registered agent;

The street address and, if different, mailing address of the association's initial principal office; and

The true name and street address and, if different, mailing address of each organizer.

The articles may contain any other provisions in addition to those required by subsection (1) of this section, including any matters referred to in subsection (3) of this section, section 7-58-305 (1), or section 7-58-305 (3).

The matters referred to in this subsection (3) may be varied only in the articles. The articles may:

State a term of duration, less than perpetual, of the limited cooperative association under section 7-58-106 (1);

Limit or eliminate the acceptance of new or additional members by the initial board of directors under section 7-58-304 (2);

Vary the percentage of votes required for members to approve an amendment to the articles under section 7-58-405;

Vary the limitations on the obligations and liability of members for association obligations under section 7-58-504;

Require a notice of an annual members meeting to state a purpose of the meeting under section 7-58-508 (2);

Provide for less than unanimous consent to action by members without a members meeting under section 7-58-516 (1)(a);

Vary the matters the board of directors may consider in making a decision under section 7-58-820;

Specify causes of dissolution under section 7-58-1202 (1);

Delegate amendment of the bylaws to the board of directors pursuant to section 7-58-405 (6);

Provide for member approval of asset dispositions under section 7-58-1501;

Subject to section 7-58-820, provide for the elimination or limitation of liability of a director to the association or its members for money damages pursuant to section 7-58-818; and

Provide for permitting or requiring indemnification under section 7-58-901 (1).

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 769, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-304. Organization of limited cooperative association.

After a limited cooperative association is formed:

If initial directors are named in the articles, the initial directors shall hold an organizational meeting to adopt initial bylaws and carry on any other business necessary or proper to complete the organization of the association; or

If initial directors are not named in the articles, the organizers shall designate the initial directors and call a meeting of the initial directors to adopt initial bylaws and carry on any other business necessary or proper to complete the organization of the association.

Unless the articles otherwise provide, the initial directors may cause the limited cooperative association to accept members, including those necessary for the association to begin business.

Initial directors need not be members.

An initial director serves until a successor is elected and qualified at a members meeting or the director is removed, resigns, is adjudged incompetent, or dies.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 770, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-305. Bylaws.

Bylaws shall be in a record and, if not stated in the articles, shall include:

A statement of the capital structure of the limited cooperative association, including:

The classes or other types of members' interests and relative rights, preferences, and restrictions granted to or imposed upon each class or other type of member's interest; and

The rights to share in profits or distributions of the association;

A statement of the method for admission of members;

A statement designating voting and other governance rights, including which members have voting power and any restriction on voting power;

A statement that a member's interest is transferable, if it is to be transferable, and a statement of the conditions upon which it may be transferred;

A statement concerning the manner in which profits and losses are allocated and distributions are made among patron members and, if investor members are authorized, the manner in which profits and losses are allocated and how distributions are made among investor members and between patron members and investor members;

A statement concerning:

Whether persons that are not members but conduct business with the association may be permitted to share in allocations of profits and losses and receive distributions; and

The manner in which profits and losses are allocated and distributions are made with respect to those persons; and

A statement of the number and terms of directors or the method by which the number and terms are determined.

Subject to subsection (3) of this section and the articles, bylaws may contain any other provision for managing and regulating the affairs of the association.

The matters referred to in this subsection (3) may be varied only in the bylaws, in the articles, or in the bylaws and the articles. The bylaws may:

Require more information to be maintained under section 7-58-112 or provided to members under section 7-58-505 (11);

Provide restrictions on transactions between a member and an association under section 7-58-113;

Provide for the percentage and manner of voting on amendments to the articles and bylaws by district, class, or voting group under section 7-58-404 (1);

Provide for the percentage vote required to amend the bylaws concerning the admission of new members under section 7-58-405 (5)(e);

Provide for terms and conditions to become a member under section 7-58-502;

Restrict the manner of conducting members meetings under sections 7-58-506 (3) and 7-58-507 (5);

Designate the presiding officer of members meetings under sections 7-58-506 (5) and 7-58-507 (7);

Require a statement of purposes in the annual meeting notice under section 7-58-508 (2);

Increase quorum requirements for members meetings under section 7-58-510 and board of directors meetings under section 7-58-815;

Allocate voting power among members, including patron members and investor members, and provide for the manner of member voting and action as permitted by sections 7-58-511 to 7-58-517;

Authorize investor members and expand or restrict the transferability of members' interests to the extent provided in sections 7-58-602 to 7-58-604;

Provide for enforcement of a marketing contract under section 7-58-704 (1);

Provide for qualification, election, terms, removal, filling vacancies, and member approval for compensation of directors in accordance with sections 7-58-803 to 7-58-805, 7-58-807, 7-58-809, and 7-58-810;

Restrict the manner of conducting board meetings and taking action without a meeting under sections 7-58-811 and 7-58-812;

Provide for frequency, location, notice, and waivers of notice for board meetings under sections 7-58-813 and 7-58-814;

Increase the percentage of votes necessary for board action under section 7-58-816 (2);

Provide for the creation of committees of the board of directors and matters related to the committees in accordance with section 7-58-817;

Provide for officers and their appointment, designation, and authority under section 7-58-822;

Provide for forms and values of contributions under section 7-58-1002;

Provide for remedies for failure to make a contribution under section 7-58-1003;

Provide for the allocation of profits and losses of the association, distributions, and the redemption or repurchase of distributed property other than money in accordance with sections 7-58-1004 to 7-58-1007;

Specify when a member's dissociation is wrongful and the liability incurred by the dissociating member for damage to the association under section 7-58-1101 (2) and (3);

Provide the personal representative, or other legal representative of, a deceased member or a member adjudged incompetent with additional rights under section 7-58-1103;

Increase the percentage of votes required for board of director approval of:

A resolution to dissolve under section 7-58-1205;

A proposed amendment to the articles or bylaws under section 7-58-402 (1)(a);

A plan of conversion under section 7-58-1603 (1);

A plan of merger under section 7-58-1607 (1); and

A proposed disposition of assets under section 7-58-1503 (1); and

Vary the percentage of votes required for members' approval of:

A resolution to dissolve under section 7-58-1205;

An amendment to the bylaws under section 7-58-405;

A plan of conversion under section 7-58-1603;

A plan of merger under section 7-58-1608; and

A disposition of assets under section 7-58-1504.

In addition to amendments permitted under part 4 of this article, the initial board of directors may amend the bylaws by a majority vote of the directors at any time before the admission of members.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 771, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-306. Required provision for members' contributions.

The articles or the bylaws shall address members' contributions pursuant to section 7-58-1001.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 774, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.